Hawaii, session 2026, GM1270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State's
long-term food security and agricultural resilience depend upon
the availability of land and water resources that can support
diversified, sustainable agricultural production. When the
agribusiness development corporation (corporation) was
established in 1994 by Act 264, Session Laws of Hawaii 1994, and
codified as chapter 163D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the
legislature envisioned that the State's transition from
plantation agriculture would release approximately seventy-five
thousand acres of agricultural lands and fifty million gallons
of irrigation water per day for reuse by diversified
agriculture.
However, three decades later, the full potential of these
resources has not been realized. The consolidation of
agricultural parcels, rehabilitation of irrigation systems, and
establishment of modern agricultural infrastructure remain
incomplete due to complex land ownership patterns, dormant
2026-2576 SB2169 CD2 SMA.docx
HNHinilMiiniMMH

Page 2
S.B. NO. s"
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
assets, and inadequate coordination among state agencies. The
lack of a clear mechanism for the State to assemble
strategically located agricultural lands and critical
infrastructure has impeded Hawaii's ability to achieve food
self-sufficiency and reduce dependence on imported foods.
The legislature further finds that the corporation was
created to facilitate the conversion of former plantation lands
and water systems to diversified agricultural use, coordinate
the development of agricultural infrastructure, and assist local
producers in overcoming structural barriers to agricultural
growth. Yet, despite its broad authority to acquire and manage
lands, the corporation presently lacks explicit statutory
authority to acquire lands or easements by condemnation for
public agricultural purposes, even in situations where voluntary
acquisition is impracticable or contrary to the public interest.
The legislature recognizes that the power of eminent domain
is an extraordinary authority that must be exercised only for a
demonstrable public use, subject to the constitutional
guarantees of just compensation and due process, and with full
regard for the State's obligations under article XI, section 7,
of the Hawaii State Constitution to protect, control, and
2026-2576 SB2169 CD2 SMA.docx

Page 3
S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
regulate the use of the State's water resources for the benefit
of its people. The legislature further acknowledges that lands
and water systems are integral to Native Hawaiian customary and
traditional rights, and to the rights of beneficiaries under the
Hawaiian Homes Commission Act of 1920, as amended.
The legislative intent of the authority established by this
Act is not to promote private commercial gain, nor to displace
existing public uses of land without compelling justification
and legislative review. Rather, the legislature seeks to
restore coherence and capacity to the State's agricultural
infrastructure policy, enabling the public sector to acquire and
manage essential agricultural resources for the long-term
benefit of the State's people, environment, and economy.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the
agribusiness development corporation to acquire real property or
any interest therein, except for real property owned in a county
with a population of more than 125,000 but less than 195,000 and
certain public lands, by condemnation pursuant to chapter 101,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, under certain circumstances.
SECTION 2. Section 163D-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
2026-2576 SB2169 CD2 SMA.docx

Page 4
S.B. NO. s"
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
"(a) Except as otherwise limited by this chapter, the
corporation may:
(1) Sue and be sued;
(2) Have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure;
(3) Make and alter bylaws for its organization and
internal management;
(4) Adopt rules under chapter 91 necessary to effectuate
this chapter in connection with its projects,
operations, and properties;
(5) Make and execute contracts and all other instruments
necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers
and functions under this chapter;
(6) Acquire or contract to acquire by grant or purchase
any real, personal, or mixed property or any interest
therein for its immediate or future use for the
purposes of this chapter; own, hold, improve, and
rehabilitate any real, personal, or mixed property
acquired, and sell, assign, exchange, transfer,
convey, lease, or otherwise dispose of, or encumber
the same;
2026-2576 SB2169 CD2 SMA.docx 4

Page 5
S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
(7) Acquire by condemnation pursuant to chapter 101 any
real property, including fixtures and improvements, or
any interest in real property, except real property
owned in a county with a population of more than
125,000 but less than 195,000 and public lands as
defined in section 171-2, for the purposes of this
chapter; provided that:
(A) The corporation makes a determination that the
property is necessary for the corporation's
immediate or future use for agricultural
irrigation systems or agricultural purposes; and
(B) Private property sought to be acquired under
threat of the exercise of the power of eminent
domain shall only be acquired through negotiated
purchase;
[-(-7-)-] (8) By itself, or in partnership with qualified
persons, acquire, construct, reconstruct,
rehabilitate, improve, alter, or repair any
infrastructure or accessory facilities in connection
with any project; own, hold, sell, assign, transfer.
2026-2576 SB2169 CD2 SMA.docx 5

Page 6
S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 2
convey, exchange, lease, or otherwise dispose of, or
encumber any project;
[ (8)-] (9) In cooperation with the department of agriculture
and biosecurity, pursuant to chapter 167, or otherwise
through direct investment or coventure with a
professional investor or enterprise or any other
person, or otherwise, to acquire, construct, operate,
and maintain water facilities for conveying,
distributing, and transmitting water for irrigation
and agricultural uses at rates or charges determined
by the corporation; provided that:
(A) This chapter shall not be construed to permit or
allow the department of agriculture and
biosecurity or [afty] agribusiness development
corporation to:
(i) Amend or modify rights or entitlements to
water as provided for by article XI,
section 7, of the Constitution of the State
of Hawaii, or the Hawaiian Homes Commission
Act, 1920, as amended, and chapter 168;
2026-2576 SB2169 CD2 SMA.docx

Page 7
S.B. NO. E
C.D. 2
(ii) Diminish or abridge the traditional and
customary rights of ahupua‘a tenants who
inhabited the Hawaiian Islands [prior to]
before 1778 under sections 1-1 and 7-1; and
(iii) Impair, abridge, or terminate the legal
rights or interests to water and its uses,
whether by lease, easement, or other means,
[which] th^ are possessed or held by
organizations whose primary purpose is to
benefit people of Hawaiian ancestry; and
(B) All usage of water shall .be in accordance with
chapter 174C and other applicable laws in the
State;
[4-9-)-] (10) Receive, examine, and determine the
acceptability of applications of qualified persons for
allowances or grants for the development of new crops
and agricultural products, the expansion of
established agricultural enterprises, and the altering
of existing agricultural enterprises;
[ (10)] (11) Coordinate its activities with any federal or
state farm credit programs;
2026-2576 SB2169 CD2 SMA.docx

Page 8 2169
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
[-H44-] Grant options to purchase any project or to
renew any lease entered into by it in connection with
any of its projects, on the terms and conditions it
deems advisable;
(13) Provide advisory, consultative, training, and
educational services, technical assistance, and advice
to any person, partnership, or corporation, either
public or private, in order to carry out the purposes
of this chapter, and engage the services of
consultants on a contractual basis for rendering
professional and technical assistance and advice;
(14) Procure insurance against any loss in connection
with its property and other assets and operations in
[•sueh] amounts and from [nuch] insurers as it deems
IS desirable;
[444)-] (15) Accept gifts or grants in any form from any
public agency or any other source; and
[ (15)] (16) Do all things necessary or proper to carry out
the purposes of this chapter."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-2576 SB2169 CD2 SMA.docx

Page 9
S.B. NO. ""
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2576 SB2169 CD2 SMA.docx 9

S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 2169, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, HawaiT 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
I
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 2169, SD 1,HD 1,CD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives